apertium-kan.kan.lexc
LEXICON 			ನೀರು__n!water
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ು #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>%<emph%>:ೇ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ುಗಳು #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%<emph%>:ುಗಳೇ  #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ಿಗೆ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<dat%>%<emph%>:ಿಗೇ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ಿಗಾಗಿ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<dat%>%<emph%>:ಿಗಾಗೇ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ುಗಳಿಗೆ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<dat%>%<emph%>:ುಗಳಿಗೇ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<gen%>: #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ಿನ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ುಗಳ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ನ್ನು #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<acc%>%<emph%>:ನ್ನೇ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ುಗಳನ್ನು #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<acc%>%<emph%>:ುಗಳನ್ನೇ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ಿನಲ್ಲಿ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>%<emph%>:ಿನಲ್ಲಿಯೇ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:ುಗಳಲ್ಲಿ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<loc%>%<emph%>:ುಗಳಲ್ಲಿಯೇ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ಿನಿಂದ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:ುಗಳಿನಿಂದ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:ುಗಳಿಂದ #;

%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:oo__inc_clit;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ುಗಳ oo__inc_clit;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ಿಗ oo__inc_clit;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ುಗಳಿಗ oo__inc_clit;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ನ್ನ oo__inc_clit;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ುಗಳನ್ನ oo__inc_clit;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ಿನಲ್ಲ oo__inc_clit;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ುಗಳಲ್ಲ oo__inc_clit;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ಿನಿಂದ oo__inc_clit;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ುಗಳಿನಿಂದ oo__inc_clit;

%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:aagi__com ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ಿನ ondige ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ುಗಳ ide__vaux;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:negation ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:Aagale ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:r__inda ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ುಗಳ aagi__com;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: aagi__com;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ಿನಲ್ಲ aagi__com ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ುಗಳಲ್ಲ aagi__com ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ಿನಲ್ಲಿ ide__vaux ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:ುಗಳಲ್ಲಿ ide__vaux ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ಿನಲ್ಲ ittu__v;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ುಗಳನ್ನ ittu__v;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ulla ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:untu ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ಿನಿಂದ aagi__com;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ಿಗ Anusara;!
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ಿ n__inda ;



%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>%<emph%>:ಿನಲ್ಲೇ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<loc%>%<emph%>:ುಗಳಲ್ಲೇ #;


LEXICON     Anusara
%+ಅನುಸಾರವಾಗಿ%<adv%>:ನುಸಾರವಾಗಿ #;



LEXICON 			month__n
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ು #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ುಗಳ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ಲ್ಲಿ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ಿನಲ್ಲಿ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:ುಗಳಲ್ಲಿ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ಿನ #;!ತಿಂಗಳಿಗೆ
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ಿಗೆ #;!

%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:varege__postpos;



LEXICON 			handshake__n
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ು #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ಲ್ಲಿ #;

LEXICON 			ಸೇವಾ__n
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ಾ  #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ಿಗೆ #;!ತಯಾರಾದ
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ಾವನ್ನು #;!ತಯಾರಾದ

%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:aagi__com ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ಾ Anusara;


LEXICON 			ಮಗು__n
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>	:ಗು #;
%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>		:ಗನು #;!ಮಗನಾದ
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<gen%>	:ಗುವಿನ #;
%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<nom%>		:ಗಳು #;
%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<acc%>		:ಗಳನ್ನು #;
%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<nom%>		:ಗಳ aagi__com ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<gen%>		:ಗಳ # ;
%<n%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<nom%>	:ಕ್ಕಳು #;
%<n%>%<mf%>%<sg%>%<acc%>	:ಕ್ಕಳನ್ನು #;
%<n%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<gen%>	:ಕ್ಕಳ #;
%<n%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<gen%>	:ಕ್ಕಳಾದ #;
%<n%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<dat%>	:ಕ್ಕಳಿಗೆ #;
%<n%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<dat%>	:ಕ್ಕಳಿಗಾಗಿ #;
%<n%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<loc%>	:ಕ್ಕಳಲ್ಲಿ #;

%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>		:ಗನ aagi__com ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>	:ulla ;


!LEXICON 			for_AAGI
!: #;!ಶೃಂಗಕ್ಕಾಗಿ
!%+for__ಆಗಿ%<post%>: #;!ಶೃಂಗಕ್ಕಾಗಿ

LEXICON 			eno
%+ಏನೋ%<part%>:ೇನೂ # ;

LEXICON 			embudu
%+ಎಂಬುದು%<post%>:ವೆಂಬುದ aagi__com ;


LEXICON 			ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n 		!mskara
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:#;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ವು #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ವ o-clit;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%<emph%>:ವೇ #;
!%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ಗಳ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ಗಳು #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ಗಳಲ್ಲ oo__inc_clit ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ಕ್ಕೆ # ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ಕ್ಕಾಗಿ # ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ಕ್ಕಾಗಿ __emph ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ಕ್ಕಾಗಿಯ o-clit ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ಕ್ಕು # ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ಗಳಿಗೆ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ದಿಂದ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ದಿಂದಾಗಿ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<ins%>%<emph%>:ದಿಂದಲೇ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:ಗಳಿಂದ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:ಗಳಿಂದ loo;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ವನ್ನು #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ಗಳನ್ನು #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ದ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ಗಳ #;!same as nom?
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ದಲ್ಲಿ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:ಗಳಲ್ಲಿ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<loc%>%<gen%>:ಗಳಲ್ಲಿನ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:ಗಳಲ್ಲ ondu ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>%<emph%>:ದಲ್ಲೇ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>%<emph%>:ದಲ್ಲಿಯೇ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>%<gen%>:ದಲ್ಲಿನ # ;

%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>%<prn%>:ವಂತ #;
%<n%>%<adj%>:ಾಸ್ಪದ # ;
%<n%>%<adj%>:ಾತ್ಮಕ # ;
%<n%>%<adj%>:ೀಯ # ;



%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ವ oo__inc_clit;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ಗಳ oo__inc_clit;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ಕ್ಕ oo__inc_clit ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ಗಳಿಗ oo__inc_clit;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ವನ್ನ oo__inc_clit;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ಗಳನ್ನ oo__inc_clit;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ದಿಂದಲ oo__inc_clit;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:ಗಳಲ್ಲಿಯ oo__inc_clit ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ದಲ್ಲಿಯ oo__inc_clit	;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:ಗಳಲ್ಲಿಯ oo__inc_clit;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ದಲ್ಲ oo__inc_clit ;




%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<gen%>%+ಅವ%<prn%>:ದವ ಅವ/__prn;

%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ದ ashtu;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ಗಳ ashtu;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:parti ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:aadharu__vaux ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ಪಡು__vaux ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:negation2 ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:andu ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ದ ondige;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ulla ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:embudu ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ದ odane;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:Golisu__v ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:kinta ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:Anusara;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ಪಡು__vaux ;


%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:aagi__com ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ವನ್ನ aagi__com;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ಗಳ aagi__com; 
!%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:aagi__com;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ದಿಂದ aagi__com;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ಗಳಿಗ aagi__com;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ದಲ್ಲ aagi__com	;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ದಲ್ಲಿ aagi__com	;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:ಗಳಿಂದ aagi__com;

%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ವನ್ನ ittu__v ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ಗಳನ್ನ ittu__v;


%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ವ ide__vaux;
%<n%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ರ aagi__com;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ide__vaux ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ಗಳ ide__vaux ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ದಲ್ಲಿ ide__vaux	;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:ಗಳಲ್ಲಿ ide__vaux;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ವ ondu;

%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:allade ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ವ untu ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:nantara;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ಗಳ nantara;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ವ endare__part ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ದ varege__postpos ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ಗಳ varege__postpos; !
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:negation2;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ante;



%<n%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%+ಮಾಡು%<v%>%<inf%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಮಾಡಲ ide__vaux;
%<n%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%+ಮಾಡು:ಮಾಡ ಮಾಡು__v ;
%<n%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%+ಮಾಡು%<v%>%<inf%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಮಾಡುವ #;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<dat%>%+ಅನುಗುಣವಾಗಿ%<adv%>:ಗಳಿಗನುಗುಣವಾಗಿಯ oo__inc_clit ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<gen%>%+ಆಗಮನ%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ದಾಗಮನ aagi__com;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>%+ಅಭಿಪ್ರಾಯ%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ಾಭಿಪ್ರಾಯ #;


%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<gen%>%+ಉದ್ದಕ್ಕೂ%<adv%>:ದುದ್ದಕ್ಕೂ #;

!ಪ್ರಪಂಚದಾಗಮನವಾಗಿರುವುದರಿಂದಲೂ




LEXICON ulla
%+ವುಳ್ಳ%<post%>:ವುಳ್ಳ # ;
%+ವುಳ್ಳ%<post%>:ುಳ್ಳದ್ದ aagi__com ;
%+ವುಳ್ಳ%<post%>:ುಳ್ಳ # ;

LEXICON 	untu
%+ಉಂಟು%<vaux%>:ುಂಟು #;

LEXICON ashtu
%+ಅಷ್ಟು%<adv%>:ಷ್ಟು # ;

LEXICON nantara
%+ನಂತರ%<adv%>:ಾನಂತರ # ;
%+ನಂತರ%<adv%>:ನಂತರ # ;

LEXICON __letter
%<letter%>: # ;

LEXICON NounRoot
ATM:ATM                             ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ತಿಂಗಳು:ತಿಂಗಳ 						month__n;
ಕೈಕುಲಕು:ಕೈಕುಲಕ 						handshake__n;
ಸೇವಾ:ಸೇವ 						ಸೇವಾ__n;
ಸೇನಾ:ಸೇನ 						ಸೇವಾ__n;
ಭಾಷಾ:ಭಾಷ  						ಸೇವಾ__n;
ಶಾಲಾ:ಶಾಲ 						ಸೇವಾ__n;
ಭದ್ರತಾ:ಭದ್ರತ 					ಸೇವಾ__n;
ಕಥಾ:ಕಥ 							ಸೇವಾ__n;
ಪತ್ರಿಕಾ:ಪತ್ರಿಕ 					ಸೇವಾ__n;
ಸಭಾ:ಸಭ 							ಸೇವಾ__n;
ಲೋಕಸಭಾ:ಲೋಕಸಭ 					ಸೇವಾ__n;
ಪರೀಕ್ಷಾ:ಪರೀಕ್ಷ 					ಸೇವಾ__n;
ಸಂರಕ್ಷಣಾ:ಸಂರಕ್ಷಣ 				ಸೇವಾ__n;
ರಚನಾ:ರಚನ 						ಸೇವಾ__n;
ಯೋಜನಾ:ಯೋಜನ 					ಸೇವಾ__n;
ಜನತಾ:ಜನತ 						ಸೇವಾ__n;
ಕಾರ್ಯಾಚರಣಾ:ಕಾರ್ಯಾಚರಣ 			ಸೇವಾ__n;
ತಯಾರ:ತಯಾರ 						ಸೇವಾ__n;
ಶಿಲಾ:ಶಿಲ 						ಸೇವಾ__n;
ಶೇಕಡಾ:ಶೇಕಡ 						ಸೇವಾ__n;
ಚಿಕಿತ್ಸಾ:ಚಿಕಿತ್ಸ 					ಸೇವಾ__n;
ಇಚ್ಚಾ:ಇಚ್ಚ 						ಸೇವಾ__n;
ರೀತ್ಯಾ:ರೀತ್ಯ 					ಸೇವಾ__n;
ಸಲಹಾ:ಸಲಹ 						ಸೇವಾ__n;
ವಿದ್ಯಾ:ವಿದ್ಯ 					ಸೇವಾ__n;
ಮನರಂಜನಾ:ಮನರಂಜನ 					ಸೇವಾ__n;
ಸಂಖ್ಯಾ:ಸಂಖ್ಯ 					ಸೇವಾ__n;
ನಟನೆ:ನಟನ 						ಸೇವಾ__n;
ಪರಿವರ್ತನೆ:ಪರಿವರ್ತನ 				ಸೇವಾ__n;
ಗಲ್ಲಾ:ಗಲ್ಲ 						ಸೇವಾ__n;
ಪ್ರಾರ್ಥನೆ:ಪ್ರಾರ್ಥನ 				ಸೇವಾ__n;
ಸುರಕ್ಷತೆ:ಸುರಕ್ಷತ 					ಸೇವಾ__n;
ಬೋಧನೆ:ಬೋಧನ 					ಸೇವಾ__n;
ಸುಧಾರಣೆ:ಸುಧಾರಣ 					ಸೇವಾ__n;
ಅರ್ಹತೆ:ಅರ್ಹತ 					ಸೇವಾ__n;
ಆರಾಧನೆ:ಆರಾಧನ						ಸೇವಾ__n;
ಚಹಾ:ಚಹ 							ಸೇವಾ__n;
ಪ್ರೌಢಶಾಲೆ:ಪ್ರೌಢಶಾಲ					ಸೇವಾ__n;
ವಾರ್ತೆ:ವಾರ್ತ                      	ಸೇವಾ__n;
ಶಸ್ತ್ರಚಿಕಿತ್ಸೆ:ಶಸ್ತ್ರಚಿಕಿತ್ಸ			ಸೇವಾ__n;
ನಿಯಂತ್ರಣ:ನಿಯಂತ್ರಣ 				ಸೇವಾ__n;
ಸಂಸ್ಕರಣ:ಸಂಸ್ಕರಣ 					ಸೇವಾ__n;
ಕ್ರಿಯ:ಕ್ರಿಯ 						ಸೇವಾ__n;
ಕಲ್ಪನೆ:ಕಲ್ಪನ 						ಸೇವಾ__n;		
ಕಲಿಕೆ:ಕಲಿಕ 						ಸೇವಾ__n;	
ಸಂಗ್ರಹಣೆ:ಸಂಗ್ರಹಣ					ಸೇವಾ__n;	
ಗುಹೆ:ಗುಹ							ಸೇವಾ__n;	
ರೇಖೆ:ರೇಖ							ಸೇವಾ__n;	
ತನಿಖೆ:ತನಿಖ 						ಸೇವಾ__n;	
ಚಿತ್ರಕಲೆ:ಚಿತ್ರಕಲ					ಸೇವಾ__n;	
ವೀಕ್ಷಣೆ:ವೀಕ್ಷಣ					ಸೇವಾ__n;	
ಪ್ರತಿಭೆ:ಪ್ರತಿಭ 					ಸೇವಾ__n;
ವಿಮರ್ಶೆ:ವಿಮರ್ಶ 					ಸೇವಾ__n;
ಮಾನ್ಯತೆ:ಮಾನ್ಯತ 					ಸೇವಾ__n;
ಹವಾ:ಹವ 							ಸೇವಾ__n;
ಸಲಹಾ:ಸಲಹ 						ಸೇವಾ__n;
ಮಗು:ಮ  							ಮಗು__n;
ವಾರ:ವಾರ 							ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ಪ್ರಪಂಚ:ಪ್ರಪಂಚ 					ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ತೈಲ:ತೈಲ 							ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ಗ್ರಂಥ:ಗ್ರಂಥ 						ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ಕಾಗದ:ಕಾಗದ 						ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ಪರಸ್ಪರ:ಪರಸ್ಪರ 					ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;	
ಶಿಲ್ಪ:ಶಿಲ್ಪ 						ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ದೇವಲಯ:ದೇವಲಯ 					ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ಕೊಲಂಬಿಯಾ:ಕೊಲಂಬಿಯಾ 								ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ಸ್ಥಾನಮಾನ:ಸ್ಥಾನಮಾನ 								ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ಧೂಮಪಾನ:ಧೂಮಪಾನ 								ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ಗೀಚುಬರಹ:ಗೀಚುಬರಹ 								ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ಕ್ಯಾಮರಾ:ಕ್ಯಾಮರಾ 								ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ಚಂಡಮಾರುತ:ಚಂಡಮಾರುತ 								ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ಅಂಗುಲ:ಅಂಗುಲ 								ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ಅಲಂಕರಣ:ಅಲಂಕರಣ 								ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ಬೌದ್ಧಧರ್ಮ:ಬೌದ್ಧಧರ್ಮ 								ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ಸ್ಫೋಟಕ:ಸ್ಫೋಟಕ 								ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ಶೀಲ:ಶೀಲ                                                 ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ಹಿಂಸಾಚಾರ:ಹಿಂಸಾಚಾರ                                                 ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ಭಾಷ್ಯ:ಭಾಷ್ಯ                                                 ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ಮಾರುತ:ಮಾರುತ                                                 ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ವಾದ್ಯವೃಂದ:ವಾದ್ಯವೃಂದ                                                 ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ಭಾವಚಿತ್ರ:ಭಾವಚಿತ್ರ                                                 ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ಬೃಂದಾವನ:ಬೃಂದಾವನ                                                 ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ಮಸಾಲಾ:ಮಸಾಲಾ                                                 ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ತಿಕ್ಕಾಟ:ತಿಕ್ಕಾಟ                                                 ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ಲೇಪ:ಲೇಪ                                                 ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ಸಂಘ:ಸಂಘ                                                 ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ಎಕ್ಸ್‌ಟ್ರಾ:ಎಕ್ಸ್‌ಟ್ರಾ                                                 ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ಗಾಗ್ರಾ:ಗಾಗ್ರಾ                                                 ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ಶ್ರವಣ:ಶ್ರವಣ                             ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ರಜಾ:ರಜಾ                             ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ಯಜಮಾನ:ಯಜಮಾನ                             ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ವರ್ಷಕಾಲ:ವರ್ಷಕಾಲ                             ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ಅವಶ್ಯ:ಅವಶ್ಯ                             ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ಅರೇಬಿಯ:ಅರೇಬಿಯ                             ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ದಿನ:ದಿನ                             ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ಆಷಾಢ:ಆಷಾಢ                             ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ಕಟ್ಟ:ಕಟ್ಟ                             ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ಏಕಾಂಕ:ಏಕಾಂಕ                             ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ವ್ಯತಿಕರಣ:ವ್ಯತಿಕರಣ                             ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ಶಿವಪುರ:ಶಿವಪುರ                             ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ಉಪಸಂಹಾರ:ಉಪಸಂಹಾರ                             ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ವಿತರಣ:ವಿತರಣ                             ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ಭೂಪಾಲ:ಭೂಪಾಲ                             ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ಬಹಳಕಾಲ:ಬಹಳಕಾಲ                             ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ಮನೆಗೆಲಸ:ಮನೆಗೆಲಸ                             ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ವಿದ್ಯುಚ್ಚಾಪ:ವಿದ್ಯುಚ್ಚಾಪ                             ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ಹೊಳ್ಳ:ಹೊಳ್ಳ                             ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ಗಮ್ಯ:ಗಮ್ಯ                             ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ದರ್ಶನ:ದರ್ಶನ					ಮುಷ್ಕರ__n;
ಮ:ಮ 			__letter;
